Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5095 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to be designated the "U.S.
Decennial Census Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
all monies received by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce as
directed by law. All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are
hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma
Department of Commerce for the purpose of preparing for any upcoming
Federal Decennial Census, including the upgrade of required
technology. Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants
issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by
law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 23rd day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3622 Page 2